apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
<pardef n="ceith/earn__n">
  <e><p><l>earn-s</l>    <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>earn-s</l>    <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>earn</l>      <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>earn</l>      <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>earna-s</l>   <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>earna-s</l>   <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>earna</l>     <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>earna</l>     <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>earnasa</l>   <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>earnasa</l>   <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>earnsa</l>    <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>earnsa</l>    <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>irne-s</l>    <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>irne</l>      <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>irnese</l>    <r>earn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ceolfhoir/eann__n">
  <e><p><l>eann</l>      <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ne-s</l>      <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ne-s</l>      <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ne-s</l>      <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ne-s</l>      <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ne</l>        <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ne</l>        <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ne</l>        <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ne</l>        <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nese</l>      <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nese</l>      <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nese</l>      <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nese</l>      <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ceáf/ar__n">
  <e><p><l>air-s</l>     <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>air</l>       <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>airse</l>     <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ar-s</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>arsa</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>raí-s</l>     <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>raí-s</l>     <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>raí</l>       <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>raí</l>       <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>raíse</l>     <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>raíse</l>     <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="c/ian__n">
  <e><p><l>ian-s</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ian-s</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ian-s</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ian</l>       <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ian</l>       <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ian</l>       <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iansa</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iansa</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iansa</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta-s</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta-s</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta-s</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iantasa</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iantasa</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iantasa</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éin</l>       <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éine-s</l>    <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éine</l>      <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éinese</l>    <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cianamha/rc__n">
  <e><p><l>irc-s</l>     <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>irc</l>       <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ircse</l>     <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rc-s</l>      <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rc</l>        <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rcsa</l>      <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ceithearn"><i>ceith</i><par n="ceith/earn__n"/></e>
<e lm="ceolfhoireann"><i>ceolfhoir</i><par n="ceolfhoir/eann__n"/></e>
<e lm="ceáfar"><i>ceáf</i><par n="ceáf/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="cian"><i>c</i><par n="c/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="cianamharc"><i>cianamha</i><par n="cianamha/rc__n"/></e>
<e lm="cianradharc"><i>cianradha</i><par n="cianamha/rc__n"/></e>
<e lm="dallradharc"><i>dallradha</i><par n="cianamha/rc__n"/></e>
<e lm="drochamharc"><i>drochamha</i><par n="cianamha/rc__n"/></e>
<e lm="díochmharc"><i>díochmha</i><par n="cianamha/rc__n"/></e>
<e lm="fadradharc"><i>fadradha</i><par n="cianamha/rc__n"/></e>
<e lm="fochmharc"><i>fochmha</i><par n="cianamha/rc__n"/></e>
<e lm="gearr-radharc"><i>gearr-radha</i><par n="cianamha/rc__n"/></e>
<e lm="imchomharc"><i>imchomha</i><par n="cianamha/rc__n"/></e>
<e lm="réamhamharc"><i>réamhamha</i><par n="cianamha/rc__n"/></e>
